Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1607
Violations; penalty.

Any person violating any of the provisions of sections 79-1601 to 79-1606 shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1919, c. 155, § 8, p. 350;

Laws 1921, c. 53, § 1(o), p. 231;

C.S.1922, § 6508m;

C.S.1929, § 79-1913;

R.S.1943, § 79-1920;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 512, p. 865;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 261;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1707;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1010.

The fact that conduct is subject to the criminal penalties under these sections does not proscribe granting of injunctive relief. State ex rel. Douglas v. Bigelow, 214 Neb. 464, 334 N.W.2d 444 (1983).

The provision for penal sanctions in the event of violations of the various statutory provisions relating to compulsory education and operation of private, denominational, and parochial schools does not foreclose the possibility of injunctive relief. State ex rel. Douglas v. Faith Baptist Church of Louisville, 207 Neb. 802, 301 N.W.2d 571 (1981).